Washington statutes.
RCW 35.17.350

Legislative—Initiative—Repeal or amendment—Method.

The commission may by means of an ordinance submit a proposition for the repeal or amendment of an ordinance, initiated by petition, by submitting it to a vote of the people at any general election and if a majority of the votes cast upon the proposition favor it, the ordinance shall be repealed or amended accordingly.

A proposition of repeal or amendment must be published before the election thereon as is an ordinance initiated by petition when submitted to election.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.17.350. Prior: 1911 c 116 s 21, part; RRS s 9110, part.]